Vermont, session 2025-2026, S93.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 61A is added to read:
CHAPTER 61A. VERMONT DATA PRIVACY ACT
§ 2415. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Abortion” means terminating a pregnancy for any purpose other
than producing a live birth.
(2)(A) “Affiliate” means a legal entity that shares common branding
with another legal entity or controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with another legal entity.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 2 of 45
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (2), “control” or
“controlled” means:
(i) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company;
(ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the
directors or of individuals exercising similar functions; or
(iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the
management of a company.
(3) “Authenticate” means to use reasonable means to determine that a
request to exercise any of the rights afforded under subdivisions 2418(a)(1)–
(4) of this title is being made by, or on behalf of, the consumer who is entitled
to exercise the consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.
(4)(A) “Biometric data” means personal data generated by automatic
measurements of an individual’s unique biological patterns or characteristics
that are used to identify a specific individual.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or
an audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific
individual.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 3 of 45
(5) “Business associate” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
(6) “Child” has the same meaning as in COPPA.
(7)(A) “Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer’s
freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to allow the
processing of personal data relating to the consumer.
(B) “Consent” may include a written statement, including by
electronic means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action.
(C) “Consent” does not include:
(i) acceptance of a general or broad terms of use or similar
document that contains descriptions of personal data processing along with
other, unrelated information;
(ii) hovering over, muting, pausing, or closing a given piece of
content; or
(iii) agreement obtained through the use of dark patterns.
(8)(A) “Consumer” means an individual who is a resident of the State.
(B) “Consumer” does not include an individual acting in a
commercial or employment context or as an employee, owner, director, officer,
or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit, or
government agency whose communications or transactions with the controller
occur solely within the context of that individual’s role with the company,
partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit, or government agency.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 4 of 45
(9) “Consumer health data” means any personal data that a controller
uses to identify a consumer’s physical or mental health condition or diagnosis,
including gender-affirming health data and reproductive or sexual health data.
(10) “Consumer health data controller” means any controller that, alone
or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing
consumer health data.
(11) “Controller” means a person who, alone or jointly with others,
determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.
(12) “COPPA” means the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act of
1998, 15 U.S.C. § 6501–6506, and any regulations, rules, guidance, and
exemptions adopted pursuant to the act, as the act and regulations, rules,
guidance, and exemptions may be amended.
(13) “Covered entity” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
(14) “Dark pattern” means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the substantial effect of subverting or impairing user autonomy, decision-
making, or choice and includes any practice the Federal Trade Commission
refers to as a “dark pattern.”
(15) “Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects
concerning the consumer” means decisions made by the controller that result in
the provision or denial by the controller of financial or lending services,
housing, insurance, education enrollment or opportunity, criminal justice,
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 5 of 45
employment opportunities, health care services, or access to essential goods or
services.
(16) “De-identified data” means data that does not identify and cannot
reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an
identified or identifiable individual, or a device linked to the individual, if the
controller that possesses the data:
(A) takes reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be
associated with an individual;
(B) publicly commits to process the data only in a de-identified
fashion and not attempt to re-identify the data; and
(C) contractually obligates any recipients of the data to satisfy the
criteria set forth in subdivisions (A) and (B) of this subdivision (16).
(17) “Gender-affirming health care services” has the same meaning as in
1 V.S.A. § 150.
(18) “Gender-affirming health data” means any personal data
concerning a past, present, or future effort made by a consumer to seek, or a
consumer’s receipt of, gender-affirming health care services.
(19) “Geofence” means any technology that uses global positioning
coordinates, cell tower connectivity, cellular data, radio frequency
identification, wireless fidelity technology data, or any other form of location
detection, or any combination of such coordinates, connectivity, data,
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 6 of 45
identification, or other form of location detection, to establish a virtual
boundary.
(20) “HIPAA” means the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-191, as may be amended.
(21) “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can
be readily identified, directly or indirectly.
(22) “Institution of higher education” means any individual who, or
school, board, association, limited liability company or corporation that, is
licensed or accredited to offer one or more programs of higher learning leading
to one or more degrees.
(23) “Mental health facility” means any health care facility in which at
least 70 percent of the health care services provided in the facility are mental
health services.
(24) “Nonprofit organization” means any organization that is qualified
for tax exempt status under I.R.C. § 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), or
501(c)(12), or any corresponding internal revenue code of the United States, as
may be amended,
(25) “Person” means an individual, association, company, limited
liability company, corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, trust, or other
legal entity.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 7 of 45
(26)(A) “Personal data” means any information that is linked or
reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable individual.
(B) “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly
available information.
(27)(A) “Precise geolocation data” means information derived from
technology, including global positioning system level latitude and longitude
coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location
of an individual with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet.
(B) “Precise geolocation data” does not include:
(i) the content of communications;
(ii) data generated by or connected to an advanced utility metering
infrastructure system; or
(iii) data generated by equipment used by a utility company.
(28) “Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations
performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets
of personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis,
deletion, or modification of personal data.
(29) “Processor” means a person who processes personal data on behalf
of a controller.
(30) “Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on
personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 8 of 45
identified or identifiable individual’s economic situation, health, personal
preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.
(31) “Protected health information” has the same meaning as in HIPAA.
(32) “Pseudonymous data” means personal data that cannot be attributed
to a specific individual without the use of additional information, provided the
additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical
and organizational measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to
an identified or identifiable individual.
(33) “Publicly available information” means information that:
(A) is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local
government records or widely distributed media; or
(B) a controller has a reasonable basis to believe that the consumer
has lawfully made available to the general public.
(34) “Reproductive or sexual health care” means any health care-related
services or products rendered or provided concerning a consumer’s
reproductive system or sexual well-being, including any such service or
product rendered or provided concerning:
(A) an individual health condition, status, disease, diagnosis,
diagnostic test or treatment;
(B) a social, psychological, behavioral, or medical intervention;
(C) a surgery or procedure, including an abortion;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 9 of 45
(D) a use or purchase of a medication, including a medication used or
purchased for the purposes of an abortion, a bodily function, vital sign, or
symptom;
(E) a measurement of a bodily function, vital sign, or symptom; or
(F) an abortion, including medical or nonmedical services, products,
diagnostics, counseling, or follow-up services for an abortion.
(35) “Reproductive or sexual health data” means any personal data
concerning an effort made by a consumer to seek, or a consumer’s receipt of,
reproductive or sexual health care.
(36) “Reproductive or sexual health facility” means any health care
facility in which at least 70 percent of the health care-related services or
products rendered or provided in the facility are reproductive or sexual health
care.
(37)(A) “Sale of personal data” means the exchange of a consumer’s
personal data by the controller to a third party for monetary or other valuable
consideration.
(B) “Sale of personal data” does not include:
(i) the disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the
personal data on behalf of the controller;
(ii) the disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of
providing a product or service requested by the consumer;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 10 of 45
(iii) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the
controller;
(iv) the disclosure of personal data where the consumer directs the
controller to disclose the personal data or intentionally uses the controller to
interact with a third party;
(v) the disclosure of personal data that the consumer:
(I) intentionally made available to the general public via a
channel of mass media; and
(II) did not restrict to a specific audience; or
(vi) the disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an
asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy or other transaction, or a
proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction, in which the
third party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets.
(38) “Sensitive data” means personal data that includes:
(A) data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or
physical health condition or diagnosis, sex life, sexual orientation, or
citizenship or immigration status;
(B) consumer health data;
(C) the processing of genetic or biometric data for the purpose of
uniquely identifying an individual;
(D) personal data collected from a known child;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 11 of 45
(E) data concerning an individual’s status as a victim of crime; and
(F) an individual’s precise geolocation data.
(39)(A) “Targeted advertising” means displaying advertisements to a
consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained
or inferred from that consumer’s activities over time and across nonaffiliated
websites or online applications to predict the consumer’s preferences or
interests.
(B) “Targeted advertising” does not include:
(i) an advertisement based on activities within the controller’s own
commonly branded website or online application;
(ii) an advertisement based on the context of a consumer’s current
search query, visit to a website, or use of an online application;
(iii) an advertisement directed to a consumer in response to the
consumer’s request for information or feedback; or
(iv) processing personal data solely to measure or report
advertising frequency, performance, or reach.
(40) “Third party” means a person, public authority, agency, or body,
other than the consumer, controller, or processor or an affiliate of the processor
or the controller.
(41) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as in section 4601 of this title.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 12 of 45
§ 2416. APPLICABILITY
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this chapter applies
to a person that conducts business in this State or a person that produces
products or services that are targeted to residents of this State and that during
the preceding calendar year:
(1) controlled or processed the personal data of not fewer than 100,000
consumers, excluding personal data controlled or processed solely for the
purpose of completing a payment transaction; or
(2) controlled or processed the personal data of not fewer than 25,000
consumers and derived more than 25 percent of the person’s gross revenue
from the sale of personal data.
(b) Section 2426 of this title and the provisions of this chapter concerning
consumer health data and consumer health data controllers apply to a person
that conducts business in this State or a person that produces products or
services that are targeted to residents of this State.
§ 2417. EXEMPTIONS
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, this chapter shall
not apply to any:
(1) body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district or agency of this
State or of any political subdivision of this State;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 13 of 45
(2) person who has entered into a contract with an entity described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection to process consumer health data on behalf of
the entity;
(3) nonprofit organization;
(4) institution of higher education;
(5) national securities association that is registered under 15 U.S.C. 78o-
3 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as may be amended;
(6) financial institution or data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-
Bliley Act, Pub. L. No. 106-102, and regulations adopted to implement that
act;
(7) covered entity or business associate, as defined in 45 C.F.R.
§ 160.103;
(8) tribal nation government organization; or
(9) air carrier, as:
(A) defined in 49 U.S.C. § 40102, as may be amended; and
(B) regulated under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, 49 U.S.C.
§ 40101 et seq. and the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 U.S.C. § 41713,
as may be amended.
(b) The following information, data, and activities are exempt from this
chapter:
(1) protected health information under HIPAA;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 14 of 45
(2) patient identifying information that is collected and processed in
accordance with 42 C.F.R. Part 2 (confidentiality of substance use disorder
patient records);
(3) identifiable private information:
(A) for purposes of the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human
Subjects, codified as 45 C.F.R. Part 46 (HHS protection of human subjects)
and in various other federal regulations; and
(B) that is otherwise information collected as part of human subjects
research pursuant to the good clinical practice guidelines issued by the
International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for
Pharmaceuticals for Human Use;
(4) information that identifies a consumer in connection with the
protection of human subjects under 21 C.F.R. Parts 6, 50, and 56, or personal
data used or shared in research, as defined in 45 C.F.R. § 164.501, that is
conducted in accordance with the standards set forth in this subdivision and in
subdivision (3) of this subsection, or other research conducted in accordance
with applicable law;
(5) information or documents created for the purposes of the Healthcare
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11101–11152, and regulations
adopted to implement that act;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 15 of 45
(6) patient safety work product that is created for purposes of improving
patient safety under 42 C.F.R. Part 3 (patient safety organizations and patient
safety work product);
(7) information or documents created for the purposes of the Healthcare
Quality Improvement Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. §§ 11101–11152, and regulations
adopted to implement that act;
(8) information derived from any of the health care-related information
listed in this subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the
requirements for de-identification pursuant to HIPAA;
(9) information originating from and intermingled to be
indistinguishable with, or information treated in the same manner as,
information exempt under this subsection that is maintained by a covered
entity or business associate, program, or qualified service organization, as
specified in 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2, as may be amended;
(10) information used for public health activities and purposes as
authorized by HIPAA, community health activities, and population health
activities;
(11) the collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or use
of any personal information bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit
standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics,
or mode of living by a consumer reporting agency, furnisher, or user that
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 16 of 45
provides information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer
report, but only to the extent that such activity is regulated by and authorized
under the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq., as may be
amended;
(12) personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed under and in
compliance with:
(A) the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. § 2721–
2725; and
(B) the Farm Credit Act, Pub. L. No. 92-181, as may be amended;
(13) personal data regulated by the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as may be amended;
(14) data processed or maintained:
(A) in the course of an individual applying to, employed by, or acting
as an agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor, consumer
health data controller, or third party, to the extent that the data is collected and
used within the context of that role;
(B) as the emergency contact information of a consumer pursuant to
this chapter, used for emergency contact purposes, or
(C) that is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another
individual relating to the individual who is the subject of the information
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 17 of 45
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection (b) and used for the purposes of
administering such benefits; and
(15) personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in relation to
price, route, or service, as such terms are used in the Federal Aviation Act of
1958, 49 U.S.C. § 40101 et seq., as may be amended, and the Airline
Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 U.S.C.§ 41713, as may be amended.
(c) Controllers, processors, and consumer health data controllers that
comply with the verifiable parental consent requirements of COPPA shall be
deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental consent pursuant to
this chapter.
§ 2418. CONSUMER RIGHTS; COMPLIANCE BY CONTROLLERS;
APPEALS
(a) A consumer shall have the right to:
(1) confirm whether or not a controller is processing the consumer’s
personal data and access the personal data, unless the confirmation or access
would require the controller to reveal a trade secret;
(2) correct inaccuracies in the consumer’s personal data, taking into
account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of
the consumer’s personal data;
(3) delete personal data provided by, or obtained about, the consumer;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 18 of 45
(4) obtain a copy of the consumer’s personal data processed by the
controller, in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable
format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller
without hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means,
provided the controller shall not be required to reveal any trade secret; and
(5) opt out of the processing of the personal data for purposes of:
(A) targeted advertising;
(B) the sale of personal data, except as provided in subsection
2420(b) of this title; or
(C) profiling in furtherance of solely automated decisions that
produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
(b)(1) A consumer may exercise rights under this section by a secure and
reliable means established by the controller and described to the consumer in
the controller’s privacy notice.
(2) A consumer may designate an authorized agent in accordance with
section 2419 of this title to exercise the rights of the consumer to opt out of the
processing of the consumer’s personal data for purposes of subdivision (a)(5)
of this section on behalf of the consumer.
(3) In the case of processing personal data of a known child, the parent
or legal guardian may exercise the consumer rights on the child’s behalf.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 19 of 45
(4) In the case of processing personal data concerning a consumer
subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement, the
guardian or the conservator of the consumer may exercise the rights on the
consumer’s behalf.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply
with a request by a consumer to exercise the consumer rights authorized
pursuant to this chapter as follows:
(1)(A) A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay,
but not later than 45 days after receipt of the request.
(B) The controller may extend the response period by 45 additional
days when reasonably necessary, considering the complexity and number of
the consumer’s requests, provided the controller informs the consumer of the
extension within the initial 45-day response period and of the reason for the
extension.
(2) If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer’s
request, the controller shall inform the consumer without undue delay, but not
later than 45 days after receipt of the request, of the justification for declining
to take action and instructions for how to appeal the decision.
(3)(A) Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be
provided by a controller, free of charge, once per consumer during any 12-
month period.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 20 of 45
(B) If requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive,
or repetitive, the controller may charge the consumer a reasonable fee to cover
the administrative costs of complying with the request or decline to act on the
request.
(C) The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly
unfounded, excessive, or repetitive nature of the request.
(4)(A) If a controller is unable to authenticate a request to exercise any
of the rights afforded under subdivisions (a)(1)–(4) of this section using
commercially reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply
with a request to initiate an action pursuant to this section and shall provide
notice to the consumer that the controller is unable to authenticate the request
to exercise the right or rights until the consumer provides additional
information reasonably necessary to authenticate the consumer and the
consumer’s request to exercise the right or rights.
(B) A controller shall not be required to authenticate an opt-out
request, but a controller may deny an opt-out request if the controller has a
good faith, reasonable, and documented belief that the request is fraudulent.
(C) If a controller denies an opt-out request because the controller
believes the request is fraudulent, the controller shall send a notice to the
person who made the request disclosing that the controller believes the request
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 21 of 45
is fraudulent, why the controller believes the request is fraudulent, and that the
controller shall not comply with the request.
(5) A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a
source other than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a
consumer’s request to delete the data pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this
section by:
(A) retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum data
necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer’s personal data remains
deleted from the controller’s records and not using the retained data for any
other purpose pursuant to the provisions of this chapter; or
(B) opting the consumer out of the processing of the personal data for
any purpose except for those exempted pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter.
(d)(1) A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the
controller’s refusal to take action on a request within a reasonable period of
time after the consumer’s receipt of the decision.
(2) The appeal process shall be conspicuously available and similar to
the process for submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to this section.
(3) Not later than 60 days after receipt of an appeal, a controller shall
inform the consumer in writing of any action taken or not taken in response to
the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 22 of 45
(4) If the appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer
with an online mechanism, if available, or other method through which the
consumer may contact the Attorney General to submit a complaint.
§ 2419. AUTHORIZED AGENTS AND CONSUMER OPT-OUT
(a) A consumer may designate another person to serve as the consumer’s
authorized agent, and act on the consumer’s behalf, to opt out of the processing
of the consumer’s personal data for one or more of the purposes specified in
subdivision 2418(a)(5) of this title.
(b) The consumer may designate an authorized agent by way of, among
other things, a technology, including an internet link or a browser setting,
browser extension, or global device setting, indicating the consumer’s intent to
opt out of the processing.
(c) A controller shall comply with an opt-out request received from an
authorized agent if the controller is able to verify, with commercially
reasonable effort, the identity of the consumer and the authorized agent’s
authority to act on the consumer’s behalf.
§ 2420. CONTROLLERS’ DUTIES; SALE OF PERSONAL DATA TO
THIRD PARTIES; NOTICE AND DISCLOSURE TO
CONSUMERS; CONSUMER OPT-OUT
(a) A controller:
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 23 of 45
(1) shall limit the collection of personal data to what is adequate,
relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation to the purposes for which the
data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer;
(2) except as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall not process
personal data for purposes that are neither reasonably necessary to, nor
compatible with, the disclosed purposes for which the personal data is
processed, as disclosed to the consumer, unless the controller obtains the
consumer’s consent;
(3) shall establish, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative,
technical, and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality,
integrity, and accessibility of personal data appropriate to the volume and
nature of the personal data at issue;
(4) shall not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without
obtaining the consumer’s consent or, in the case of the processing of sensitive
data concerning a known child, without processing the data in accordance with
COPPA;
(5) shall not process personal data in violation of the laws of this State
and federal laws that prohibit unlawful discrimination against consumers;
(6) shall provide an effective mechanism for a consumer to revoke the
consumer’s consent under this section that is at least as easy as the mechanism
by which the consumer provided the consumer’s consent and, upon revocation
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 24 of 45
of the consent, cease to process the data as soon as practicable, but not later
than 15 days after the receipt of the request;
(7) shall not process the personal data of a consumer for purposes of
targeted advertising, or sell the consumer’s personal data without the
consumer’s consent, under circumstances where a controller has actual
knowledge, and willfully disregards, that the consumer is at least 13 years of
age but younger than 16 years of age; and
(8) shall not discriminate against a consumer for exercising any of the
consumer rights contained in this chapter, including denying goods or services,
charging different prices or rates for goods or services, or providing a different
level of quality of goods or services to the consumer.
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall not be construed to require a
controller to provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a
consumer that the controller does not collect or maintain, or prohibit a
controller from offering a different price, rate, level, quality, or selection of
goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for no
fee if the offering is in connection with a consumer’s voluntary participation in
a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card
program.
(c) A controller shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible,
clear, and meaningful privacy notice that includes:
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 25 of 45
(1) the categories of personal data processed by the controller;
(2) the purpose for processing personal data;
(3) how consumers may exercise their consumer rights, including how a
consumer may appeal a controller’s decision with regard to the consumer’s
request;
(4) the categories of personal data that the controller shares with third
parties, if any;
(5) the categories of third parties, if any, with which the controller
shares personal data; and
(6) an active email address or other online mechanism that the consumer
may use to contact the controller.
(d) If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal
data for targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously
disclose the processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may
exercise the right to opt out of the processing.
(e)(1) A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice,
one or more secure and reliable means for consumers to submit a request to
exercise their consumer rights pursuant to this chapter.
(2) The means shall take into account the ways in which consumers
normally interact with the controller, the need for secure and reliable
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 26 of 45
communication of the requests, and the ability of the controller to verify the
identity of the consumer making the request.
(3) A controller shall not require a consumer to create a new account in
order to exercise consumer rights but may require a consumer to use an
existing account.
(4)(A) The means shall include:
(i) providing a clear and conspicuous link on the controller’s
website to an web page that enables a consumer, or an agent of the consumer,
to opt out of the targeted advertising or sale of the consumer’s personal data;
and
(ii) not later than January 1, 2026, allowing a consumer to opt out
of any processing of the consumer’s personal data for the purposes of targeted
advertising, or any sale of the personal data, through an opt-out preference
signal sent to the controller with the consumer’s consent indicating the
consumer’s intent to opt out of any the processing or sale, by a platform,
technology, or other mechanism that shall:
(I) not unfairly disadvantage another controller;
(II) not make use of a default setting, but rather require the
consumer to make an affirmative, freely given, and unambiguous choice to opt
out of any processing of the consumer’s personal data pursuant to this chapter;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 27 of 45
(III) be consumer-friendly and easy to use by the average
consumer;
(IV) be as consistent as possible with any other similar
platform, technology, or mechanism required by any federal or State law or
regulation; and
(V) enable the controller to accurately determine whether the
consumer is a resident of this State and whether the consumer has made a
legitimate request to opt out of any sale of the consumer’s personal data or
targeted advertising.
(B) If a consumer’s decision to opt out of any processing of the
consumer’s personal data for the purposes of targeted advertising, or any sale
of the personal data, through an opt-out preference signal sent in accordance
with the provisions of subdivision (A) of this subdivision (e)(4) conflicts with
the consumer’s existing controller-specific privacy setting or voluntary
participation in a controller’s bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features,
discounts, or club card program, the controller shall comply with the
consumer’s opt-out preference signal but may notify the consumer of the
conflict and provide to the consumer the choice to confirm the controller-
specific privacy setting or participation in the program.
(5) If a controller responds to consumer opt-out requests received
pursuant to subdivision (4)(A) of this subsection by informing the consumer of
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 28 of 45
a charge for the use of any product or service, the controller shall present the
terms of any financial incentive offered pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section for the retention, use, sale, or sharing of the consumer’s personal data.
§ 2421. PROCESSORS’ DUTIES; CONTRACTS BETWEEN
CONTROLLERS AND PROCESSORS
(a) A processor shall adhere to the instructions of a controller and shall
assist the controller in meeting the controller’s obligations under this chapter,
including:
(1) taking into account the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor, by appropriate technical and organizational
measures, to the extent reasonably practicable, to fulfill the controller’s
obligation to respond to consumer rights requests;
(2) taking into account the nature of processing and the information
available to the processor, by assisting the controller in meeting the
controller’s obligations in relation to the security of processing the personal
data and in relation to the notification of a data broker security breach or
security breach, as defined in section 2430 of this title, of the system of the
processor, in order to meet the controller’s obligations; and
(3) providing necessary information to enable the controller to conduct
and document data protection assessments.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 29 of 45
(b)(1) A contract between a controller and a processor shall govern the
processor’s data processing procedures with respect to processing performed
on behalf of the controller.
(2) The contract shall be binding and clearly set forth instructions for
processing data, the nature and purpose of processing, the type of data subject
to processing, the duration of processing, and the rights and obligations of both
parties.
(3) The contract shall require that the processor:
(A) ensure that each person processing personal data is subject to a
duty of confidentiality with respect to the data;
(B) at the controller’s direction, delete or return all personal data to
the controller as requested at the end of the provision of services, unless
retention of the personal data is required by law;
(C) upon the reasonable request of the controller, make available to
the controller all information in its possession necessary to demonstrate the
processor’s compliance with the obligations in this chapter;
(D) after providing the controller an opportunity to object, engage
any subcontractor pursuant to a written contract that requires the subcontractor
to meet the obligations of the processor with respect to the personal data; and
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 30 of 45
(E) make available to the controller upon the reasonable request of
the controller, all information in the processor’s possession necessary to
demonstrate the processor’s compliance with this chapter.
(4) A processor shall provide a report of an assessment to the controller
upon request.
(c) This section shall not be construed to relieve a controller or processor
from the liabilities imposed on the controller or processor by virtue of the
controller’s or processor’s role in the processing relationship, as described in
this chapter.
(d)(1) Determining whether a person is acting as a controller or processor
with respect to a specific processing of data is a fact-based determination that
depends upon the context in which personal data is to be processed.
(2) A person who is not limited in the person’s processing of personal
data pursuant to a controller’s instructions, or who fails to adhere to the
instructions, is a controller and not a processor with respect to a specific
processing of data.
(3) A processor that continues to adhere to a controller’s instructions
with respect to a specific processing of personal data remains a processor.
(4) If a processor begins, alone or jointly with others, determining the
purposes and means of the processing of personal data, the processor is a
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 31 of 45
controller with respect to the processing and may be subject to an enforcement
action under section 2425 of this title.
§ 2422. CONTROLLERS’ DATA PROTECTION ASSESSMENTS;
DISCLOSURE TO ATTORNEY GENERAL
(a) A controller shall conduct and document a data protection assessment
for each of the controller’s processing activities that presents a heightened risk
of harm to a consumer, which for the purposes of this section includes:
(1) the processing of personal data for the purposes of targeted
advertising;
(2) the sale of personal data;
(3) the processing of personal data for the purposes of profiling, where
the profiling presents a reasonably foreseeable risk of:
(A) unfair or deceptive treatment of, or unlawful disparate impact on,
consumers;
(B) financial, physical, or reputational injury to consumers;
(C) a physical or other intrusion upon the solitude or seclusion, or the
private affairs or concerns, of consumers, where the intrusion would be
offensive to a reasonable person; or
(D) other substantial injury to consumers; and
(4) the processing of sensitive data.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 32 of 45
(b)(1) Data protection assessments conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of
this section shall identify and weigh the benefits that may flow, directly and
indirectly, from the processing to the controller, the consumer, other
stakeholders, and the public against the potential risks to the rights of the
consumer associated with the processing, as mitigated by safeguards that can
be employed by the controller to reduce the risks.
(2) The controller shall factor into any data protection assessment the
use of de-identified data and the reasonable expectations of consumers, as well
as the context of the processing and the relationship between the controller and
the consumer whose personal data will be processed.
(c)(1) The Attorney General may require that a controller disclose any data
protection assessment that is relevant to an investigation conducted by the
Attorney General, and the controller shall make the data protection assessment
available to the Attorney General.
(2) The Attorney General may evaluate the data protection assessment
for compliance with the responsibilities set forth in this chapter.
(3) Data protection assessments shall be confidential and shall be
exempt from disclosure and copying under the Public Records Act.
(4) To the extent any information contained in a data protection
assessment disclosed to the Attorney General includes information subject to
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 33 of 45
attorney-client privilege or work product protection, the disclosure shall not
constitute a waiver of the privilege or protection.
(d) A single data protection assessment may address a comparable set of
processing operations that include similar activities.
(e) If a controller conducts a data protection assessment for the purpose of
complying with another applicable law or regulation, the data protection
assessment shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements established in this
section if the data protection assessment is reasonably similar in scope and
effect to the data protection assessment that would otherwise be conducted
pursuant to this section.
(f) Data protection assessment requirements shall apply to processing
activities created or generated after July 1, 2025 and are not retroactive.
§ 2423. DE-IDENTIFIED AND PSEUDONYMOUS DATA;
CONTROLLERS’ DUTIES; EXCEPTIONS; APPLICABILITY OF
CONSUMERS’ RIGHTS; DISCLOSURE AND OVERSIGHT
(a) A controller in possession of de-identified data shall:
(1) take reasonable measures to ensure that the data cannot be associated
with an individual;
(2) publicly commit to maintaining and using de-identified data without
attempting to re-identify the data; and
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 34 of 45
(3) contractually obligate any recipients of the de-identified data to
comply with the provisions of this chapter.
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to:
(1) require a controller or processor to re-identify de-identified data or
pseudonymous data; or
(2) maintain data in identifiable form, or collect, obtain, retain, or access
any data or technology, in order to be capable of associating an authenticated
consumer request with personal data.
(c) This chapter shall not be construed to require a controller or processor
to comply with an authenticated consumer rights request if the controller:
(1) is not reasonably capable of associating the request with the personal
data or it would be unreasonably burdensome for the controller to associate the
request with the personal data;
(2) does not use the personal data to recognize or respond to the specific
consumer who is the subject of the personal data, or associate the personal data
with other personal data about the same specific consumer; and
(3) does not sell the personal data to any third party or otherwise
voluntarily disclose the personal data to any third party other than a processor,
except as otherwise permitted in this section.
(d) The rights afforded under subdivisions 2418(a)(1)–(4) of this title shall
not apply to pseudonymous data in cases where the controller is able to
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 35 of 45
demonstrate that any information necessary to identify the consumer is kept
separately and is subject to effective technical and organizational controls that
prevent the controller from accessing the information.
(e) A controller that discloses pseudonymous data or de-identified data
shall exercise reasonable oversight to monitor compliance with any contractual
commitments to which the pseudonymous data or de-identified data is subject
and shall take appropriate steps to address any breaches of those contractual
commitments.
§ 2424. CONSTRUCTION OF CONTROLLERS’ AND PROCESSORS’
DUTIES
(a) This chapter shall not be construed to restrict a controller’s, processor’s,
or consumer health data controller’s ability to:
(1) comply with federal, state, or municipal laws, ordinances, or
regulations;
(2) comply with a civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry, investigation,
subpoena, or summons by federal, state, municipal, or other governmental
authorities;
(3) cooperate with law enforcement agencies concerning conduct or
activity that the controller, processor, or consumer health data controller
reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state, or municipal
laws, ordinances, or regulations;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 36 of 45
(4) investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend legal claims;
(5) provide a product or service specifically requested by a consumer;
(6) perform under a contract to which a consumer is a party, including
fulfilling the terms of a written warranty;
(7) take steps at the request of a consumer prior to entering into a
contract;
(8) take immediate steps to protect an interest that is essential for the life
or physical safety of the consumer or another individual, and where the
processing cannot be manifestly based on another legal basis;
(9) prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to security incidents,
identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious, or deceptive activities or any
illegal activity; preserve the integrity or security of systems; or investigate,
report, or prosecute those responsible for the action;
(10) engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical research
in the public interest that adheres to all other applicable ethics and privacy laws
and is approved, monitored, and governed by an institutional review board that
determines, or similar independent oversight entities that determine:
(A) whether the deletion of the information is likely to provide
substantial benefits that do not exclusively accrue to the controller;
(B) the expected benefits of the research outweigh the privacy risks;
and
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 37 of 45
(C) whether the controller or consumer health data controller has
implemented reasonable safeguards to mitigate privacy risks associated with
research, including any risks associated with re-identification;
(11) assist another controller, processor, consumer health data
controller, or third party with any of the obligations under this chapter; or
(12) process personal data for reasons of public interest in the area of
public health, community health, or population health, but solely to the extent
that the processing is:
(A) subject to suitable and specific measures to safeguard the rights
of the consumer whose personal data is being processed; and
(B) under the responsibility of a professional subject to
confidentiality obligations under federal, state, or local law.
(b) The obligations imposed on controllers, processors, or consumer health
data controllers under this chapter shall not restrict a controller’s, processor’s,
or consumer health data controller’s ability to collect, use, or retain data for
internal use to:
(1) conduct internal research to develop, improve, or repair products,
services, or technology;
(2) effectuate a product recall;
(3) identify and repair technical errors that impair existing or intended
functionality; or
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 38 of 45
(4) perform internal operations that are reasonably aligned with the
expectations of the consumer or reasonably anticipated based on the
consumer’s existing relationship with the controller or consumer health data
controller, or are otherwise compatible with processing data in furtherance of
the provision of a product or service specifically requested by a consumer or
the performance of a contract to which the consumer is a party.
(c)(1) The obligations imposed on controllers, processors, or consumer
health data controllers under this chapter shall not apply where compliance by
the controller, processor, or consumer health data controller with this chapter
would violate an evidentiary privilege under the laws of this State.
(2) This chapter shall not be construed to prevent a controller, processor,
or consumer health data controller from providing personal data concerning a
consumer to a person covered by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of the
State as part of a privileged communication.
(d)(1) A controller, processor, or consumer health data controller that
discloses personal data to a processor or third-party controller pursuant to this
chapter shall not be deemed to have violated this chapter if the processor or
third-party controller that receives and processes the personal data violates this
chapter, provided, at the time the disclosing controller, processor, or consumer
health data controller disclosed the personal data, the disclosing controller,
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 39 of 45
processor, or consumer health data controller did not have actual knowledge
that the receiving processor or third-party controller would violate this chapter.
(2) A third-party controller or processor receiving personal data from a
controller, processor, or consumer health data controller in compliance with
this chapter is not in violation of this chapter for the transgressions of the
controller, processor, or consumer health data controller from which the third-
party controller or processor receives the personal data.
(e) This chapter shall not be construed to:
(1) impose any obligation on a controller or processor that adversely
affects the rights or freedoms of any person, including the rights of any person:
(A) to freedom of speech or freedom of the press guaranteed in the
First Amendment to the United States Constitution; or
(B) under 12 V.S.A. § 1615;
(2) apply to any person’s processing of personal data in the course of the
person’s purely personal or household activities; or
(3) require an independent school as defined in 16 V.S.A. § 11(a)(8) or a
private institution of higher education, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.,
to delete personal data or opt out of processing of personal data that would
unreasonably interfere with the provision of education services by or the
ordinary operation of the school or institution.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 40 of 45
(f)(1) Personal data processed by a controller or consumer health data
controller pursuant to this section may be processed to the extent that the
processing is:
(A) reasonably necessary and proportionate to the purposes listed in
this section; and
(B) adequate, relevant, and limited to what is necessary in relation to
the specific purposes listed in this section.
(2)(A) Personal data collected, used, or retained pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section shall, where applicable, take into account the nature and
purpose or purposes of the collection, use, or retention.
(B) The data shall be subject to reasonable administrative, technical,
and physical measures to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility
of the personal data and to reduce reasonably foreseeable risks of harm to
consumers relating to the collection, use, or retention of personal data.
(g) If a controller or consumer health data controller processes personal
data pursuant to an exemption in this section, the controller or consumer health
data controller bears the burden of demonstrating that the processing qualifies
for the exemption and complies with the requirements in subsection (f) of this
section.
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 41 of 45
(h) Processing personal data for the purposes expressly identified in this
section shall not solely make a legal entity a controller or consumer health data
controller with respect to the processing.
§ 2425. ENFORCEMENT BY ATTORNEY GENERAL; NOTICE OF
VIOLATION; CURE PERIOD; REPORT; PENALTY
(a) The Attorney General shall have exclusive authority to enforce
violations of this chapter.
(b)(1) During the period beginning on July 1, 2025 and ending on
December 31, 2026, the Attorney General shall, prior to initiating any action
for a violation of any provision of this chapter, issue a notice of violation to the
controller or consumer health data controller if the Attorney General
determines that a cure is possible.
(2) If the controller or consumer health data controller fails to cure the
violation within 60 days after receipt of the notice of violation, the Attorney
General may bring an action pursuant to this section.
(3) Annually, on or before February 1, the Attorney General shall
submit a report to the General Assembly disclosing:
(A) the number of notices of violation the Attorney General has
issued;
(B) the nature of each violation;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 42 of 45
(C) the number of violations that were cured during the available
cure period; and
(D) any other matter the Attorney General deems relevant for the
purposes of the report.
(c) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the Attorney General may, in
determining whether to grant a controller or processor the opportunity to cure
an alleged violation described in subsection (b) of this section, consider:
(1) the number of violations;
(2) the size and complexity of the controller or processor;
(3) the nature and extent of the controller’s or processor’s processing
activities;
(4) the substantial likelihood of injury to the public;
(5) the safety of persons or property;
(6) whether the alleged violation was likely caused by human or
technical error; and
(7) the sensitivity of the data.
(d) This chapter shall not be construed as providing the basis for, or be
subject to, a private right of action for violations of this chapter or any other
law.
(e) Subjection to the exception in subsection (f) of this section, a violation
of the requirements of this chapter shall constitute an unfair and deceptive act
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 43 of 45
in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title and shall be enforced
solely by the Attorney General, provided that a consumer private right of
action under subsection 2461(b) of this title shall not apply to the violation.
(f) The Attorney General shall provide guidance to controllers and
processors for compliance with the terms of the Vermont Data Privacy Act.
Any processor or controller that, in the opinion of the Attorney General,
materially complies with the guidance provided by the Attorney General shall
not constitute an unfair and deceptive act in commerce.
§ 2426. CONSUMER HEALTH DATA PRIVACY
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section and
subsections 2417(b) and (c) of this title, no person shall:
(1) provide any employee or contractor with access to consumer health
data unless the employee or contractor is subject to a contractual or statutory
duty of confidentiality;
(2) provide any processor with access to consumer health data unless the
person and processor comply with section 2421 of this title;
(3) use a geofence to establish a virtual boundary that is within 1,750
feet of any health care facility, including any mental health facility or
reproductive or sexual health facility, for the purpose of identifying, tracking,
collecting data from, or sending any notification to a consumer regarding the
consumer’s consumer health data; or
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 44 of 45
(4) sell, or offer to sell, consumer health data without first obtaining the
consumer’s consent.
(b) Notwithstanding section 2416 of this title, subsection (a) of this section,
and the provisions of sections 2415–2425 of this title, inclusive, concerning
consumer health data and consumer health data controllers, apply to persons
that conduct business in this state and persons that produce products or
services that are targeted to residents of this state.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to any:
(1) body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district or agency of this
State or of any political subdivision of this State;
(2) person who has entered into a contract with an entity described in
subdivision (1) of this subsection to process consumer health data on behalf of
the entity;
(3) institution of higher education;
(4) national securities association that is registered under 15 U.S.C. 78o-
3 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as may be amended;
(5) financial institution or data subject to Title V of the Gramm-Leach-
Bliley Act, Pub. L. No. 106-102, and regulations adopted to implement that
act;
(6) covered entity or business associate, as defined in 45 C.F.R.
§ 160.103;
VT LEG #380226 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.93
2025 Page 45 of 45
(7) tribal nation government organization; or
(8) air carrier, as:
(A) defined in 49 U.S.C. § 40102, as may be amended; and
(B) regulated under the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, 49 U.S.C.
§ 40101 et seq. and the Airline Deregulation Act of 1978, 49 U.S.C. § 41713,
as may be amended.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #380226 v.1